tests/verbs-local.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../unm.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../unm.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) iv.aa.local p2.o_sg":                 #in the thesis, it refers to I/me in these cases as object
    ahol<v><tv><aa><local><p2><sg><o_sg>: ktaholi           #so I took that approach in labeling them here
    ahol<v><tv><aa><local><p2><pl><o_sg>: ktaholihemo
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) iv.aa.local p2.o_pl":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><local><p2><pl><o_pl>: ktaholihena           #This form might be optional interpretation as pl subject?
                                                                #appears to be 2p sg? (Pg 18, 37, 38 of thesis)
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) iv.aa.local p1.o_sg":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><local><p1><sg><o_sg>: ktaholel
    ahol<v><tv><aa><local><p1><sg><o_pl>: ktaholelhumo
    ahol<v><tv><aa><local><p1><pl><o_pl>: ktaholelhumena        #List of possibly helpful pages from the grammar
                                                                #29, 34, 35, 83, 91, 110, 136, 186
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) iv.aa.local p1.o_pl":       
    ahol<v><tv><aa><local><p1><pl><o_pl>: ktahaleluhena
    
    
